Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 121.3 of Title 20, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
For purposes of Section 129 of Title 20 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, the term "municipal judge" shall mean any full-time judge
presiding over a court of record in the State of Oklahoma who is not
practicing law as a licensed attorney.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15709 GRS 01/04/26




Req. No. 15709 Page 1